Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1204.
do enact as follows:AB1204,11Section 1. 64.09 (3) of the statutes is repealed.AB1204,22Section 2. 66.0502 (4) (e) of the statutes is created to read:AB1204,2,5366.0502 (4) (e) Any of the following bodies may impose on the designated 4employee a residency requirement that contains the terms and conditions that the 5body considers appropriate:AB1204,2,761. A police department, fire department, or combined protective services 7department, on the chief of that department.AB1204,2,882. A city or village, on a city or village administrator.AB1204,2,993. A county without an elected county executive, on a county administrator.AB1204,2,11104. A school board, on a school district administrator, as defined in s. 115.001 11(8).AB1204,312Section 3. 66.0502 (4) (f) of the statutes is created to read:AB1204,2,161366.0502 (4) (f) A city or village that has elected, or is in the process of electing, 14a city manager under s. 64.09 may impose on the city manager a residency 15requirement that contains terms and conditions that the city or village considers 16appropriate.AB1204,417Section 4. Initial applicability.AB1204,2,1918(1) This act first applies to an individual who is hired on the effective date of 19this subsection.AB1204,2,2020